Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.08.100

Ballot titles.

Ballot titles for elections under this chapter shall be prepared by the city attorney. The ballot statement in the election for adopting or rejecting the proposed charter shall clearly state that, upon adoption of the proposed charter, the city would be governed by its charter and by this title.

[ 2015 c 53 s 51; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.100.]

NOTES: